Massachusetts, session 194th, H3738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 1 of chapter 122 of the acts of 2019, is hereby amended by striking out the definition
“Motorized bicycle” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Motorized bicycle” or “moped”, a pedal bicycle which has a helper motor, or a non-
pedal bicycle which has a motor, with a cylinder capacity not exceeding 50 cubic centimeters, an
automatic transmission, and which can operate at a speed between 15 and 30 miles per hour.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 90, as so amended, is hereby further amended
by striking out the definition “Motorized scooter” and inserting in place thereof the following
definition:-
of 3

“Motorized scooter”, any 2 wheeled tandem or 3 wheeled device that has handlebars, is
designed to be stood or sat upon by the operator, is powered by an electric or gas powered motor
that is capable of propelling the device with or without human propulsion at a speed in excess of
15 miles per hour. A “motorized scooter” shall not include a motorcycle or motorized bicycle or
a 3 wheeled motorized wheelchair.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 90, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 1D and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 1D. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, motorized
bicycles and motorized scooters shall be subject to requirements for the registration of motor
vehicles as described in section 2. The fee for the registration of a motorized bicycle or
motorized scooter shall be as set in clause 2 of section 33. The registrar shall furnish, to every
person whose motorized bicycle or motorized scooter is registered under this chapter, 2 number
plates of suitable design for display on said motorized bicycle or motorized scooter in
accordance with section 6.
The owner or operator of a motorized bicycle or motorized scooter shall carry an
insurance policy with minimum coverage of $1,000 prior to operation of said motorized bicycle
or motorized scooter.
If an individual operates a motorized bicycle or motorized scooter upon any way or in
any place to which the public has a right of access, or any place to which members of the public
have access as invitees or licensees, and without stopping and making known their name,
residence and the register number of the motorized bicycle or motorized scooter goes away after
knowingly colliding with or otherwise causing injury to any other vehicle or property, the owner
of 3

of said motorized bicycle or motorized scooter shall be jointly and severally liable with the
operator for said injury.
SECTION 4. Section 6 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 1, the following words:- , motorized bicycle, motorized
scooter.
SECTION 5. Section 9 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 2, the first time it appears, the following words:- ,
motorized bicycle, motorized scooter.
SECTION 6. Section 24 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 896, the following words:- , motorized bicycle or
motorized scooter.
SECTION 7. Said section 24 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 941, the following words:- , motorized
bicycle or motorized scooter.
SECTION 8. Said section 24 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 951, the following words:- , motorized
bicycle or motorized scooter.
of 3